src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
! =============== !
!! !!!Verb morphology !
! =============== !

!LEXICON sx ! this is an ad hoc lexicon waiting for classification.
!s1 ;

LEXICON s1
!! __@LEXNAME@__ nevna
               standard_ir ; ! Verbal forms
 +V+PrfPrc:%>d p7          ; ! Adjectival forms


LEXICON s2
!! __@LEXNAME@__ keypa
  standard_ir_t ;
  p39           ;

LEXICON SETA
!! __@LEXNAME@__
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:%>ur #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:%>ur #  ;
                     s2 ;

LEXICON s3
!! __@LEXNAME@__ leiða
               standard_ir ;
 +V+PrfPrc:%>d p18         ;

LEXICON s4
!! __@LEXNAME@__ frøa
               inf        ;
               pres_ir    ;
               prt_dd     ;
               imp_prsptc ;
               sup_tt     ;
 +V+PrfPrc:%>d p7         ;

LEXICON s5
!! __@LEXNAME@__ senda
               standard_ir ;
 +V+PrfPrc:%>d p7          ;

LEXICON s6
!! __@LEXNAME@__ hirða
               standard_ir ;
 +V+PrfPrc:%>d p7          ;

LEXICON s7
!! __@LEXNAME@__ gista
  standard_ir_t ;
  p5            ;


LEXICON s8
!! __@LEXNAME@__ kenna
               standard_ir ;
 +V+PrfPrc:%>d p7          ;

LEXICON s9
!! __@LEXNAME@__ klippa
  standard_ir_t ;
  p5            ;


LEXICON s10
!! __@LEXNAME@__ fylgja
               jinf       ;
               pres_ir_sg ;
          :j   pres_pl    ;
               sup        ;
               prt_d      ;
 +V+PrfPrc:%>d p7         ;
               imp        ;
          :j   prsptc     ;

LEXICON s11 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__  roykja
               jinf       ;
               pres_ir_sg ;
          :j   pres_pl    ;
               sup        ;
               prt_t      ;
 +V+PrfPrc:%>t p5         ;
               imp        ;
          :j   prsptc     ;


LEXICON s12 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ boyggja
               jinf       ;
               pres_ir_sg ;
          :j   pres_pl    ;
               sup        ;
               prt_d      ;
 +V+PrfPrc:%>d p7         ;
               imp        ;
          :j   prsptc     ;


LEXICON s13 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ søkkja
    jinf       ;
    pres_ir_sg ;
 :j pres_pl    ;
    sup_t      ;
    prt_t      ;
    p5         ;
    imp        ;
 :j prsptc     ;


LEXICON s14 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ heingja
                    jinf       ;
          :%^EIO    jinf       ;
                    pres_ir_sg ;
          :%^EIO    pres_ir_sg ;
          :j        pres_pl    ;
          :%^EIO%>j pres_pl    ;
          :%^EIO    prt_d      ;
          :%^EIO    imp        ;
                    imppl      ;
          :%^EIO    sup        ;
 +V+PrfPrc:%^EIO%>d p7         ;
          :j        prsptc     ;
          :%^EIO%>j prsptc     ;


LEXICON s15 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ skeinkja
           jinf       ;
 :%^EIO    jinf       ;
           pres_ir_sg ;
 :%^EIO    pres_ir_sg ;
 :j        pres_pl    ;
 :%^EIO%>j pres_pl    ;
 :%^EIO    prt_t      ;
 :%^EIO    imp        ;
           imppl      ;
 :%^EIO    sup_t      ;
           p5         ;
 :j        prsptc     ;
 :%^EIO%>j prsptc     ;

LEXICON s15_2 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ steikja
        jinf       ;
        pres_ir_sg ;
 :j     pres_pl    ;
 :%^EIO prt_t      ;
        imp        ;
 :%^EIO sup_t      ;
        p5         ;
 :j     prsptc     ;

LEXICON s16 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ flekja
        jinf       ;
        pres_ir_sg ;
 :j     pres_pl    ;
 :%^WVV prt_d      ;
        imp        ;
 :j     prsptc     ;
 :%^WVV sup        ;
        p5         ;

LEXICON s17 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ berja
                 jinf     ;
                 pres_jir ;
          :%^WVV prt_d    ;
          :j     impsg    ;
 +V+Imp+Pl:jið   #     ;
          :j     prsptc   ;
          :%^WVV sup      ;
                 p7       ;

LEXICON s18 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ krevja
                 jinf      ;
                 pres_ur_j ;
          :%^WVV prt_d     ;
                 impsg     ;
 +V+Imp+Pl:jið   #      ;
          :j     prsptc    ;
          :%^WVV sup       ;
                 p7        ;

LEXICON s19 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ dylja
                 jinf      ;
                 pres_ur_j ;
          :%^WVV prt_d     ;
          :      impsg     ;
 +V+Imp+Pl:jið   #      ;
          :j     prsptc    ;
          :%^WVV sup       ;
                 p7        ;

LEXICON s20 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ leggja
 :egg  jinf       ;
 :egg  pres_ur_j2 ;
 :eg   prt_ði     ;
 :øg   prt_du     ;
 :egg  imp        ;
 :eggj prsptc     ;
 :ag   sup        ;
       p8         ;

LEXICON s21 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ selja
               jinf      ;
               pres_ur_j ;
          :    prt_d     ;
          :    impsg     ;
 +V+Imp+Pl:jið #      ;
          :j   prsptc    ;
          :    sup       ;
               p7        ;

LEXICON s22 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ ryðja
 :      jinf       ;
 :      pres_ur_j2 ;
 :%^WVV prt_d      ;
 :      imp        ;
 :j     prsptc     ;
 :%^WVV sup_tt     ;
 :      p18        ;

!LEXICON s22_1 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ ýðja
! :ýð  jinf       ;
! :ýð  pres_ur_j2 ;
! :ýð  pres_ir_j2 ;
! :u   prt_dd     ;
! :ý   prt_dd     ;
! :ýð  imp        ;
! :ýðj prsptc     ;
! :u   sup_tt     ;
! :ý   sup_tt     ;
 !	p18        ; " Needs stem to go to p18

LEXICON s23 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ smyrja
               :yr     jinf    ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:%>yrji #    ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:%>yr   #    ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:%>yrt  #    ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:%>yr   #    ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:%>yrja #    ;
               :ur     prt_d   ;
               :yr     impsg   ;
               :yrj    imppl_j ;
               :yrj    prsptc  ;
               :ur     sup     ;
                       p7      ;

LEXICON s24 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ flysa
        inf        ;
        pres_ur    ; ! XXX not pres_null
 :%^WVV prt_d      ;
        imp_prsptc ;
 :%^WVV sup        ;
        p5         ;

LEXICON s25 !l
!! __@LEXNAME@__ iva
               inf        ;
               pres_ir    ;
               prt_d      ;
               imp_prsptc ;
               sup_a      ;
 +V+PrfPrc:%>d p6         ;

LEXICON s26 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ plaga
             inf     ;
             pres_ar ;
             prt_d   ;
             sup     ;
 +V+Sup:%>að #    ;


LEXICON s26_1 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ mála->máldi
             inf        ;
             pres_ar    ;
             prt_d      ;
             imp_prsptc ;
             sup        ;
 +V+Sup:%>að #       ;

LEXICON s27 !s
!! __@LEXNAME@__ páa
             inf        ;
             pres_ar    ;
             prt_dd     ;
             imp_prsptc ;
 +V+Imp+Sg:a #       ;
             sup_tt     ;
             p18        ;

LEXICON s28 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ skaða
  inf        ;
  pres_ar    ;
  prt_d      ;
  imp_prsptc ;
  sup        ;
  p18        ;

LEXICON s29 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ brúka
             inf        ;
             pres_ar    ;
             prt_d      ;
             imp_prsptc ;
 +V+Imp+Sg:a #       ;
             sup        ;
             p5         ;

LEXICON s30 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ kalla
    inf     ;
    pres_ar ;
    prt_a   ;
 :a impsg   ; !deviant kalla
    imppl   ;
    prsptc  ;
    sup_a   ;
    p6      ;

LEXICON s31 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ only gera and *gera
               :er    inf        ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:%>eri #       ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:%>ert #       ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:%>er  #       ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:%>er  #       ;
               :er    pres_pl    ;
               :er    imp_prsptc ;
               :jør   prt_d      ;
               :jør   sup        ;
                      p7         ;

LEXICON s32 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ búgva
               :gv        inf                ;
               :gv        pres_strong_s1     ;
               :%^IUML    pres_strong_s23_t1 ;
                          prt_ð              ;
               :gv        pres_pl            ;
               :gv        imp_prsptc         ;
                          sup_in             ;
                          p32                ;
